src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.aff
SFX X 0 маётгандингизлар-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандингизларми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандингизлармикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганди [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандики [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганди-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганди-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганди-ю [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганди-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандими [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандимикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандилар [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандиларки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандилар-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандилар-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандилар-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандилар-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандиларми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандилармикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандек [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандек-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандек-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандек-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандек-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандек-а [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандекман [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандекман-а [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандекманки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандекман-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандекман-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандекман-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандекман-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандекманми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандекманмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандекмиз [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандекмиз-а [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандекмизки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандекмиз-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандекмиз-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандекмиз-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандекмиз-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандекмизми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандекмизмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексан-а [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексанки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексан-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексан-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексан-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексан-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексанми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексанмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексиз [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексиз-а [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексизки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексиз-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексиз-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексиз-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексиз-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексизми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексизмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексанлар [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексанлар-а [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексанларки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексанлар-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексанлар-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексанлар-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексанлар-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексанларми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексанлармикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексизлар [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексизлар-а [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексизларки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексизлар-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексизлар-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексизлар-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексизлар-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексизларми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандексизлармикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандеклар [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандеклар-а [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандекларки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандеклар-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандеклар-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандеклар-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандеклар-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандекларми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандеклармикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандек-а [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекман [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекман-а [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекманки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекман-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекман-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекман-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекман-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекманми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекманмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекмиз [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекмиз-а [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекмизки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекмиз-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекмиз-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекмиз-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекмиз-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекмизми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекмизмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексан-а [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексанки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексан-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексан-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексан-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексан-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексанми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексанмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексиз [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексиз-а [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексизки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексиз-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексиз-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексиз-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексиз-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексизми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексизмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексанлар [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексанлар-а [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексанларки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексанлар-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексанлар-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексанлар-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексанлар-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексанларми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексанлармикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексизлар [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексизлар-а [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексизларки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексизлар-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексизлар-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексизлар-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексизлар-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексизларми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандексизлармикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандеклар [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандеклар-а [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекларки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандеклар-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандеклар-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандеклар-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандеклар-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандекларми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётгандеклармикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандир [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандир-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандир-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандир-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандир-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирман [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирманки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирман-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирман-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирман-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирман-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирманми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирмиз [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирмизки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирмиз-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирмиз-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирмиз-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирмиз-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирмизми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсан [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсанки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсан-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсан-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсан-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсан-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсанми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсиз [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсизки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсиз-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсиз-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсиз-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсиз-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсизми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсанлар [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсанларки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсанлар-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсанлар-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсанлар-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсанлар-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсанларми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсизлар [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсизларки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсизлар-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсизлар-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсизлар-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсизлар-ов [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирсизларми [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирлар [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирларки [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирлар-ку [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирлар-да [^аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётгандирлар-у [^аеёиоуўэюя]
