src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.dic
ававла/X
авраттир/X
ағнат/X
ажаблан/X
ажраш/X
айбла/X
айқаш/X
айнат/X
айтиш/X
акиллаш/X
ақир/X
аласла/X
алжит/X
алмашил/X
амаллан/X
анграй/X
анқай/X
аразла/X
арзит/X
арқонлан/X
арчи/X
аслаҳала/X
астарла/X
атирла/X
ахтарин/X
ачомлашиш/X
бағирлаш/X
бадномлаш/X
байбайлат/X
баландлат/X
бараварлан/X
баробарла/X
батраклаш/X
баҳслаш/X
бедорлан/X
безартир/X
безовтала/X
беклан/X
беллаш/X
бердиртир/X
бесўнақайлаш/X
бетлаштирил/X
бешовла/X
бижбижла/X
биқинтир/X
билдир/X
билқиллат/X
биркитил/X
битказ/X
блокла/X
бодрат/X
боққиздир/X
болшевиклаштир/X
бориш/X
бот/X
бошқала/X
бошлаш/X
бўғизлат/X
бўғовлан/X
бўзарт/X
бўзрайтир/X
букил/X
бўктар/X
бўлаш/X
бўлин/X
бўрала/X
буржуалаш/X
бурқират/X
бўрси/X
бўталтир/X
бутунла/X
бўшаттир/X
бўял/X
вадилла/X
вайса/X
валдира/X
варанғлат/X
ваҳшийлаш/X
вижирла/X
витаминлаштирил/X
войдодла/X
гавдалантир/X
галалан/X
гандиракла/X
гапирт/X
гезар/X
гижбангла/X
гипотиреозг/X
гувгувла/X
гудронлан/X
гумбурлат/X
гупур/X
гурулла/X
ғажи/X
ғалдира/X
ғарчиллат/X
ғижмалоқла/X
ғилмай/X
ғинғғинғлаш/X
ғитилла/X
ғувулла/X
ғужмаклан/X
ғўрала/X
даврлаштир/X
дайдилаш/X
дамбала/X
даракла/X
дарозлаш/X
дахлсизлантир/X
дейиш/X
депсан/X
дийдира/X
диктаторлаш/X
дингилла/X
дистилляциялан/X
дозала/X
дорилат/X
дудуқлан/X
дўқирла/X
дўмпай/X
дўппослат/X
дурустлан/X
ёвлан/X
ёғдир/X
едир/X
ёздиргиз/X
ейил/X
ёқинқира/X
ёлғизла/X
елкалаш/X
елпит/X
ёмонлаш/X
енгиллаш/X
ёп/X
ёрдамлаш/X
ёрлақа/X
етаклаш/X
еткар/X
ётсира/X
ёшарт/X
жавдира/X
жадаллантир/X
жамғарил/X
жарақлат/X
жекириш/X
жийдир/X
жилдира/X
жилолантир/X
жингалакла/X
жирилла/X
жовра/X
жонсизлан/X
жулдурлан/X
жўра/X
завқлан/X
замла/X
заранглан/X
захалат/X
зидлаш/X
зипилла/X
зориқтир/X
ивит/X
излаш/X
илвира/X
илинтир/X
ингилла/X
индустрлаштирил/X
интиқтир/X
ириллаш/X
исрофлан/X
ихчамла/X
ишқал/X
ишчанлаш/X
йиқилавер/X
йўғонлаштир/X
йўнал/X
кайфлантир/X
камиттир/X
катализла/X
кеккайтир/X
кептирил/X
кетиш/X
кий/X
кириш/X
кишнат/X
койит/X
конституциялаштир/X
кувла/X
кўкаламзорлаштирил/X
кўлобла/X
кунлаш/X
кураш/X
кўтар/X
кучлантир/X
қадамла/X
қайилиш/X
қайтиш/X
қалинлаш/X
қаноатлантирил/X
қарорлаштир/X
қаторлан/X
қиёсла/X
қийинлаш/X
қийшангла/X
қимти/X
қис/X
қичат/X
қозон/X
қона/X
қоплаш/X
қочиртир/X
қуврат/X
қуқула/X
қултулла/X
қўнқайиш/X
қуриш/X
қуршал/X
қўшалоқла/X
ланғилла/X
липилла/X
локлат/X
маданийлаш/X
майиштир/X
мароқлантирил/X
маъқуллан/X
мечкайлаш/X
милдират/X
минил/X
мойлат/X
муаммолаш/X
мукаммаллаш/X
мумиёла/X
мустаҳкамла/X
навла/X
натижала/X
низомла/X
нишонлантир/X
нордонлаш/X
нураттир/X
обориш/X
оғдиртир/X
оз/X
оқартирил/X
олисла/X
оммалаштир/X
ориқлан/X
осонлан/X
оч/X
ошир/X
паллала/X
парпира/X
пахмай/X
пийпалат/X
пирсиллат/X
пишиқла/X
пойлатқиз/X
пошнала/X
пуркал/X
рағбатлантирил/X
ранжиш/X
ремонтлан/X
руҳлан/X
сайраш/X
сандира/X
саранглаш/X
сахийлаш/X
селги/X
сероблаш/X
сиз/X
сийраклан/X
силжиш/X
синг/X
сирғалтир/X
сифатла/X
соғлантир/X
соллан/X
стаканла/X
суғуртир/X
суйиб-сийпала/X
сўл/X
супургиз/X
сурин/X
сусайт/X
суян/X
тайёрлантир/X
тактаклат/X
таққосла/X
тамбала/X
танишиш/X
таралтир/X
тарқатиш/X
тасирла/X
тахтакачла/X
ташлаттир/X
театрлаштирил/X
тезлантирил/X
тенглаштир/X
теранлаштирил/X
тиға/X
тийғон/X
тиқил/X
тилкалаш/X
тиниқлан/X
тиран/X
тирқираш/X
титиш/X
товсил/X
толдир/X
топиш/X
тортқилан/X
тугатил/X
тўдалан/X
тузла/X
тўкмоқлан/X
тўла/X
тўлқинлан/X
тўнкариш/X
тур/X
тўртала/X
тутил/X
тўшат/X
увла/X
ўжарлан/X
ўздирил/X
уйғунлаштир/X
уймалан/X
ўкситтир/X
ула/X
ўлтирғиз/X
уна/X
ундаш/X
ўрала/X
ўринла/X
ўрта/X
ўтал/X
ўтқиз/X
ўхшаттир/X
учмоқ-қўн/X
уюш/X
фаҳмлат/X
хавфсин/X
хасталаш/X
хиналат/X
хлорлан/X
хотирлат/X
хўрлат/X
ҳаволат/X
ҳаккала/X
ҳаракатланиш/X
ҳижжала/X
ҳовучла/X
ҳузурлантир/X
ҳуҳулаш/X
чайин/X
чақилла/X
чалдирил/X
чангит/X
чарақлаш/X
чегарала/X
четлан/X
чиздирил/X
чиқазил/X
чимран/X
чирқиллат/X
чоғла/X
чувалан/X
чуғурла/X
чўктирил/X
чўлла/X
чўткалаш/X
шавқлантир/X
шалдира/X
шаппатила/X
шафақлан/X
шикоятлан/X
шимдиртир/X
ширқиллат/X
шовурла/X
шоштирил/X
шўнғит/X
эговлат/X
элан/X
эмизил/X
эрит/X
эснаш/X
ювиниш/X
юқ/X
юмил/X
юритиш/X
яккалан/X
ялинтир/X
ямаш/X
яратиш/X
яссила/X
